Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.050

Rules and standards.

The secretary with the advice of the emergency medical services and trauma care steering committee established under *RCW 18.73.050 shall adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, prescribing:

(1) Standards for the operation of a poison information center;

(2) Standards and procedures for certification, recertification and decertification of poison center medical directors and poison information specialists; and

(3) Standards and procedures for reciprocity with other states or national certifying agencies.

[ 1990 c 269 s 21; 1987 c 214 s 20.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.73.050 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 23.